nl: Installatiepunt houder: Ventilatierooster; CD-sleuf; Dashboard; Vorkstuurpen; Handgreep; Hoofdsteun; Meerdere posities; Achteruitkijkspiegel; Rolkooi; UTV-stang; Universeel; Voorruit; Juk; Andere
zh-TW: 支架安裝點: 出風口; CD 槽; 儀表板; 前叉立管; 車把; 頭枕; 多位置; 後視鏡; 防滾架; UTV 橫桿; 通用; 擋風玻璃; 軛架; 其他
el: Σημείο εγκατάστασης βάσης: Αεραγωγός; Υποδοχή CD; Ταμπλό; Στέλεχος πιρουνιού; Τιμόνι; Προσκέφαλο; Πολλαπλές θέσεις; Εσωτερικός καθρέφτης; Ρολό κλουβί; Μπάρα UTV; Καθολικής χρήσης; Παρμπρίζ; Ζυγός; Άλλο
pl: Punkt instalacji uchwytu: Kratka wentylacyjna; Szczelina CD; Deska rozdzielcza; Mostek kierownicy; Kierownica; Zagłówek; Wielopozycyjny; Lusterko wsteczne; Klatka bezpieczeństwa; Pałąk UTV; Uniwersalny; Przednia szyba; Jarzmo; Inne
da: Monteringsinstallationspunkt: Ventilationsudtag; CD-åbning; Instrumentbræt; Forgaffelrør; Styr; Nakkestøtte; Multiposition; Bakspejl; Rullebur; UTV-stang; Universal; Forrude; Åg; Andet
pt-PT: Ponto de instalação do suporte: Saída de ar; Ranhura de CD; Painel; Espiga do garfo; Guiador; Encosto de cabeça; Multi-posição; Espelho retrovisor; Gaiola de proteção; Barra UTV; Universal; Para-brisas; Jugo; Outro
zh-CN: 支架安装点: 出风口; CD 插槽; 仪表板; 前叉立管; 车把; 头枕; 多位置; 后视镜; 防滚架; UTV 横杆; 通用; 挡风玻璃; 方向盘架; 其他
sv: Monteringsinstallationspunkt: Ventilationsgaller; CD-spår; Instrumentpanel; Gaffelstam; Styre; Nackstöd; Flera positioner; Backspegel; Rullbur; UTV-stång; Universell; Vindruta; Ok; Övrigt
th: จุดติดตั้งขาตั้ง: ช่องแอร์; ช่องซีดี; แผงหน้าปัด; แกนตะเกียบ; ราวมือจับ; พนักพิงศีรษะ; หลายตำแหน่ง; กระจกมองหลัง; โรลล์เคจ; บาร์ UTV; อเนกประสงค์; กระจกหน้า; โยค; อื่นๆ
fi: Kiinnikkeen asennuspiste: Ilmanvaihtoaukko; CD-aukko; Kojelauta; Haarukanvarsi; Ohjaustanko; Niskatuki; Moniasentoinen; Taustapeili; Turvakaari; UTV-tanko; Yleinen; Tuulilasi; Ies; Muu
es: Punto de instalación del soporte: Rejilla de ventilación; Ranura de CD; Tablero; Vástago de horquilla; Manillar; Reposacabezas; Multiposición; Espejo retrovisor; Jaula antivuelco; Barra UTV; Universal; Parabrisas; Horquilla; Otros
fr: Point d’installation du support: Grille d'aération; Lecteur CD; Tableau de bord; Potence de fourche; Guidon; Appui-tête; Multi-positions; Rétroviseur; Arceau de sécurité; Barre UTV; Universel; Pare-brise; Joug; Autre
ru: Точка установки крепления: Вентиляционное отверстие; Слот для CD; Приборная панель; Рулевая колонка; Ручка; Подголовник; Многопозиционный; Зеркало заднего вида; Каркас безопасности; Дуга UTV; Универсальное; Ветровое стекло; Хомут; Другой
bg-BG: Точка за монтиране на стойката: Вентилационен отвор; CD слот; Табло; Вилка; Кормило; Подглавник; Многопозиционен; Огледало за обратно виждане; Ролетна клетка; UTV лост; Универсален; Предно стъкло; Хомот; Други
ja: マウント設置ポイント: エアベント; CDスロット; ダッシュボード; フォークステム; ハンドルバー; ヘッドレスト; マルチポジション; 後方確認ミラー; ロールケージ; UTVバー; ユニバーサル; フロントガラス; ヨーク; その他
pt-BR: Ponto de instalação do suporte: Saída de ar; Slot de CD; Painel; Mesa do garfo; Guidão; Encosto de cabeça; Multiposição; Espelho retrovisor; Gaiola de protecção; Barra UTV; Universal; Para-brisa; Suporte; Outro
nb: Monteringsinstallasjonspunkt: Luftventil; CD-spor; Dashbord; Gaffelstamme; Styre; Nakkestøtte; Flerposisjons; Bakspeil; Rullebur; UTV-stang; Universal; Frontrute; Åk; Annet
hr-HR: Točka instalacije nosača: Ventilacijski otvor; CD utor; Kontrolna ploča; Viljuška upravljača; Ručka; Naslon za glavu; Više pozicija; Retrovizor; Kavez; UTV šipka; Univerzalno; Vjetrobran; Jaram; Ostalo
en: Mount installation point: Air vent; CD slot; Dashboard; Fork stem; Handlebar; Headrest; Multi-position; Rearview mirror; Roll cage; UTV bar; Universal; Windshield; Yoke; Other
vi: Điểm lắp đặt giá đỡ: Cửa gió; Khe CD; Bảng điều khiển; Cổ phuộc; Tay nắm; Tựa đầu; Đa vị trí; Gương chiếu hậu; Hộp có bánh xe; Thanh UTV; Phổ quát; Kính chắn gió; Gông; Khác
sk-SK: Montážny bod držiaka: Vzduchový otvor; CD slot; Palubná doska; Predstavec vidlice; Riadidlá; Opierka hlavy; Viacpolohovýv; Spätné zrkadlo; Ochranná klietka; UTV tyč; Univerzálny; Čelné sklo; Jho; Iné
sl-SI: Točka namestitve nosilca: Zračna reža; CD reža; Armaturna plošča; Steblo vilice; Krmilo; Naslon za glavo; Večpoložajni; Vzvratno ogledalo; Varnostno ogrodje; UTV drog; Univerzalno; Vetrobransko steklo; Jarem; Drugo
tr: Montaj kurulum noktası: Havalandırma ızgarası; CD yuvası; Gösterge paneli; Çatal gövdesi; Tutamaç; Kafalık; Çok pozisyonlu; Dikiz aynası; Güvenlik kafesi; UTV barı; Her mekana uygun; Ön cam; Yük; Diğer
ko: 마운트 설치 지점: 송풍구; CD 슬롯; 대시보드; 포크 스템; 핸들바; 머리 받침대; 멀티 포지션; 백미러; 롤 케이지; UTV 바; 범용; 윈드실드; 요크; 기타
hu: Tartótelepítési pont: Szellőzőrács; CD nyílás; Műszerfal; Villa szár; Fogantyú; Fejtámasz; Több pozíciós; Visszapillantó tükör; Bukócső; UTV rúd; Általános; Szélvédő; Járom; Egyéb
de: Halterungs-Installationspunkt: Lüftungsgitter; CD-Schlitz; Armaturenbrett; Gabelschaft; Griffstange; Kopfstütze; Mehrere Positionen; Rückspiegel; Überrollkäfig; UTV-Bügel; Universell; Windschutzscheibe; Joch; Sonstiges
it: Punto di installazione del supporto: Bocchetta aria; Slot CD; Cruscotto; Stelo forcella; Manubrio; Poggiatesta; Multi-posizione; Supporti per specchietti retrovisori; Custodia a rullo; Barra UTV; Universale; Parabrezza; Giogo; Altro
cs: Bod instalace držáku: Větrací mřížka; Slot CD; Palubní deska; Představec vidlice; Řídítka; Opěrka hlavy; Vícepolohové; Zpětné zrcátko; Rolovací klec; Tyč UTV; Univerzální; Čelní sklo; Třmen; Jiné
lt-LT: Tvirtinimo montavimo vieta: Oro ventiliacijos anga; CD diskavedžio plyšys; Prietaisų skydelis; Šakės stiebas; Tiesi rankena; Galvos atrama; Daugiapozicinis; Galinio vaizdo veidrodėlis; Saugos lankai; UTV strypas; Universalus; Priekinis stiklas; Sąvara; Kita
ro-RO: Punct de instalare suport: Grilă de aerisire; Slot CD; Bord; Tijă furcă; Mâner tip bară; Suport pentru cap; Multi-poziție; Oglindă retrovizoare; Roll cage; Bară UTV; Universal; Parbriz; Jug; Altele